Utah statutes.
58-72-303.   Terms of license -- Expiration -- Renewal.

(1) (a)  Each license issued under this chapter shall be issued in accordance with a two-year renewal cycle established by rule.

(b)  A renewal period may be extended or shortened by as much as one year to maintain established renewal cycles or to change an established renewal cycle.

(2)  Each license automatically expires on the expiration date shown on the license unless renewed by the licensee in accordance with Section 58-1-308.

(3)  Renewal qualifications shall include:

(a)  either documentation of current and active NCCAOM certification; or

(b)  meeting the same professional development requirements as those licensed under this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 90, 2007 General Session

